Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.250

Intraoral massage—Endorsement.

(1) A massage therapist licensed under this chapter may apply for an endorsement to perform intraoral massage upon completion of training determined by the board and specified in rules. Training must include intraoral massage techniques, cranial anatomy, physiology, and kinesiology, hygienic practices, safety and sanitation, pathology, and contraindications.

(2) A massage therapist who has obtained an intraoral massage endorsement to his or her massage therapist license may practice intraoral massage.

[ 2016 c 41 s 15; 2007 c 272 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.